Utah statutes.
53B-19-103.   Acceptance of gifts by University of Utah and Utah State University.

The University of Utah and Utah State University are authorized to receive gifts, contributions, and donations of all kinds, including gifts and contributions of trees, plants, and shrubbery of every variety to promote the purposes and pursuits of an arboretum.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

